North Carolina, session 2025, SB482.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 99D of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article 1, consisting of G.S. 99D-1. Article 1 shall be titled "Civil Rights."
SECTION 2. The Revisor of Statutes shall change references to "Chapter" in
G.S. 99D-1 to "Article."
SECTION 3. Chapter 99D of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 2.
"Individual Freedoms.
"§ 99D-10. Individual Freedom Bill of Rights.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the following fundamental rights
are recognized and may not be violated absent a compelling State interest coupled by means to
achieve that interest that are narrowly tailored. For purposes of this Article, "narrowly tailored"
means are those that are no broader than necessary to accomplish the intended purpose. This bill
of rights includes all of the following:
(1) No person shall be subjected to warrantless surveillance, tracking, or data
collection by any agency of the State or political subdivision of the State.
(2) No agency of the State or political subdivision of the State may require a
person to disclose private medical decisions, religious beliefs, or personal
political affiliations to obtain government benefits, employment, or services.
In addition, no agency of the State or political subdivision of the State may
*S482-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
make determinations with respect to government benefits, employment, or
services if such information is displayed or known.
(3) No agency of the State or political subdivision of the State may disclose,
weaponize, or track personal health information unlawfully.
(4) No agency of the State or political subdivision of the State may deny or restrict
reproductive health care, contraception, or any other medical treatment based
on ideology rather than medical science.
(5) No agency of the State or political subdivision of the State may override
parental authority without due process in cases of abuse, neglect, or harm.
(6) Education must be fact-based, ensuring (i) parental concerns are addressed
without restricting access to accurate historical and scientific information and
(ii) teachings provided are historically accurate and free from political
manipulation.
(7) No agency of the State or political subdivision of the State may compel a
person to affirm or promote a particular political ideology in public education
or workplace settings.
(8) No agency of the State or political subdivision of the State may deny a person
employment, housing, or public services based on private political beliefs,
medical history, or lawful personal conduct.
(9) No agency of the State or political subdivision of the State may interfere with
employment and housing rights in a way that is not fair and merit-based, free
from quotas and ideological discrimination."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 482-First Edition